Mississippi, session 2026, SB2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A local law enforcement agency shall notify  a juvenile's school district of a juvenile's felony arrest within twenty-four (24) hours of the arrest. (2)  For the purposes of this section: (a) "Juvenile" means a person older than twelve (12) years of age and younger than eighteen (18) years of age. (b)  "Local law enforcement" means the arresting authority within the same county of the juvenile's school district. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.